Utah statutes.
11-25-17.   Residential rehabilitation bonds as investments or deposits.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, bonds issued pursuant to this part shall be legal investments for all trust funds, the funds of insurance companies, savings and loan associations, investment companies and banks, both savings and commercial, and shall be legal investments for executors, administrators, trustees, and all other fiduciaries. The bonds shall be legal investments for state school funds and for any fund which may be invested in county, municipal, or school district bonds, and the bonds shall be deemed to be securities which may properly and legally be deposited with, and received by, any state or municipal officer or by any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state is now, or may hereafter be, authorized by law, including deposits to secure public funds.

